Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1906
Limited radiographer, defined.

Limited radiographer means a person licensed to practice medical radiography pursuant to section 38-1916. Limited radiographer does not include a person certified under section 38-3012.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 644.